Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.065

Jurisdiction—Vulnerable adult protection orders.

The superior courts have jurisdiction over vulnerable adult protection order proceedings under this chapter.

[ 2021 c 215 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.